District of Columbia statutes.
8-417

Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

(a)

Make a pesticide recommendation or use a pesticide in a manner inconsistent with the labeling thereof, or in violation of the restrictions imposed by the Environmental Protection Agency or the Mayor on the use of that pesticide;

(b)

Falsify, or refuse or neglect to maintain or make available, records required to be kept by this chapter and by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto;

(c)

Use fraud or misrepresentation in applying for certification or a license;

(d)

Refuse or neglect to comply with any limitations or restrictions on his certification or license;

(e)

Make false or fraudulent claims through any media which misrepresent the effect of a pesticide or the method to be utilized in the application of a pesticide;

(f)

Apply any known ineffective or improper pesticide;

(g)

Operate faulty or unsafe equipment;

(h)

Use or supervise the use of a pesticide in a faulty, careless, or negligent manner;

(i)

Make false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports;

(j)

Aid, abet, or conspire with any other person to evade the provisions of this chapter;

(k)

Make fraudulent or misleading statements during or after an inspection concerning a pest infestation;

(l)

Impersonate any federal, state, or District inspector or official;

(m)

Distribute any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded, or any device which is misbranded;

(n)

Fail to register a pesticide in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

(o)

Violate any other provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation promulgated by the Mayor pursuant thereto.

History

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 18, 24 DCR 6867

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-410.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-751.17.